Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB66.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Social Worker Educational Enrollment and Training Program Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Approved facility." A facility approved by the department for participation in the program."Approved Master of Social Work program." An academic program at an accredited school of social work approved by the department to prepare professional personnel for employment in 123456789101112131415161718 accordance with the act of July 9, 1987 (P.L.220, No.39), known as the Social Workers, Marriage and Family Therapists and Professional Counselors Act."Commitment stipend." Money provided under the program to a recipient."Department." The Department of Human Services of the Commonwealth."Internship." A field placement required as part of an approved Master of Social Work program authorized by the department for the program under section 4."Program." The Social Worker Educational Enrollment and Training Program established under section 3."Qualified applicant." An individual who meets all of the criteria under section 3(b)."Recipient." A qualified applicant who receives a commitment stipend.Section 3. Social Worker Educational Enrollment and Training Program.(a) Establishment.--The Social Worker Educational Enrollment and Training Program is established within the department. The department shall administer the program to provide commitment stipends to qualified applicants. The department may consult with the Department of Health to administer the program.(b) Qualifications.--To qualify for the program, an individual shall meet all of the following criteria:(1) The individual is a resident of this Commonwealth.(2) The individual is currently enrolled in an approved Master of Social Work program and maintains a 3.0 GPA or higher.(3) The individual submits an application to the 20250HB0066PN0054 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department on a form and in a manner specified by the department.(c) Stipends.--A recipient shall be awarded a commitment stipend of $5,000 per semester while engaged in an internship as part of an approved Master of Social Work program and maintaining a 3.0 GPA or higher. The amount shall be adjusted annually for inflation in accordance with the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers: All Items (CPI-U) for the United States as published by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, for the previous 12-month period.Section 4. Authorization of internships.Subject to the availability of money for the program, the department shall authorize internships located within an approved facility for recipients to participate in the program in accordance with the following:(1) The department shall ensure that internships provide qualified applicants with clinical training, supervision and instructional experiences that prepare qualified applicants with the necessary competencies to enter into the behavioral health care workforce.(2) The department shall ensure that internships satisfy the requirements for supervised experience necessary to earn a Master of Social Work from an approved Master of Social Work program.Section 5. Award of internships.The department shall establish a process for a qualified applicant to apply for and receive an internship in accordance with this act.Section 6. Funding of program.The department shall award commitment stipends to recipients 20250HB0066PN0054 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to the extent that money is available to fund the administration of the program.Section 7. Regulations.The department shall promulgate regulations, adopt policies and procedures and establish forms as necessary to implement this act.Section 8. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250HB0066PN0054 - 4 - 12345678